Mississippi, session 2026, HB1510.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 25-32-4, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 25-32-4.  The public defender of the Seventh Circuit Court District may appoint three (3) full-time assistant public defenders who shall perform duties in the Seventh Circuit Court District and the Capitol Complex Improvement District (CCID) Inferior Court.  Such appointments shall be made in addition to those authorized as of July 1, 2023 in Section 25-32-3. The full-time assistant public defenders shall receive compensation in an amount equal to the compensation paid to full-time assistant public defenders in the Seventh Circuit Court District subject to available funds specifically appropriated by the Legislature. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.